Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2308
Permit; conditions; inspection of facility; fee.

(1) No person shall be issued a domesticated cervine animal facility permit under section 54-2305 without proof of initial inspection and approval of the minimum construction requirements established under this section.

(2) The department shall inspect and approve or disapprove:

(a) The initial construction and new construction of perimeter fencing; and

(b) The initial construction and new construction of a handling facility which is capable of sorting and restraining individual animals for testing, identification, treatment, or other purposes deemed necessary by the department.

(3) The department may inspect and approve or disapprove:

(a) The maintenance of perimeter fencing; and

(b) The maintenance of a handling facility which is capable of sorting and restraining individual animals for testing, identification, treatment, or other purposes deemed necessary by the department.

(4) The department shall, in consultation with the commission, adopt and promulgate rules and regulations specifying the minimum initial construction, subsequent new construction, and maintenance requirements of perimeter fencing and handling facilities and shall establish a fee to defray the expenses associated with inspecting domesticated cervine animal facilities.

Laws 1999, LB 404, § 7.